Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.214

Clean energy technology—Workforce training recommendations—Transition to retirement study.

(1) Each biennium, the board shall develop recommendations for necessary steps to support workforce training required for clean energy technology occupations. The board shall consult with impacted postsecondary training partners, including higher education providers and apprenticeship programs, and consider the following parameters in the development of their analysis and recommendations, including identifying:

(a) Occupational training and skills already covered in existing training programs;

(b) New skills that can be integrated into existing training programs;

(c) Occupations and skillsets that require new training programs to be developed; and

(d) Resources needed to deliver training programs and support workers in the transition to clean energy technology.

(2) The board shall conduct a study of the feasibility of a transition to retirement program to preserve income, medical, and retirement benefits for workers close to retirement who face job loss or transition because of energy technology sector changes. The board may contract with an organization to complete the study.

[ 2023 c 231 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 231: See note following RCW 43.41.470.